District of Columbia statutes.
29A-301.57

Repealed

Liquidation proceedings — Qualification of receivers.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 288, Pub. L. 87-569, § 57
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-1057.
1981 Ed., § 29-558.
2001 Ed., § 29-301.57.